Utah statutes.
70A-3-601.   Discharge and effect of discharge.
(1)  The obligation of a party to pay the instrument is discharged as stated
in this chapter or by an act or agreement with the party which would discharge
an obligation to pay money under a simple contract.
(2)  Discharge of the obligation of a party is not effective against a person
acquiring rights of a holder in due course of the instrument without notice of
the discharge.
